Utah statutes.
39-1-52.   Encampments.

Encampments of the National Guard shall be such as may be provided for by the National Guard Bureau under authority of Congress. The cost of maintenance, transportation and subsistence, and other expenses of such encampments and maneuvers, shall not be paid by the state, but as provided for by Congress.

